Hawaii statutes.
§607-2 Fees to be accounted for. With
the exception of fees prescribed by the supreme court by rule of court for
electronic document certification, electronic copies of documents, and for
providing bulk access to electronic court records and compilations of data,
which shall be deposited into the judiciary computer system special fund, and
fees intended to reimburse officers for actual expenditures made by them, all
judges', clerks', sheriffs', and deputy sheriffs' fees provided for in this
chapter and accruing from any action pending in any court shall be deposited to
the credit of the general fund of the State. [CC 1859, pt of §1281; am L 1907,
c 62, §1; RL 1925, §2555; RL 1935, §3804; RL 1945, §9742; am L 1945, c 57, §1;
RL 1955, §219-2; am L 1965, c 97, §15; HRS §607-2; am L 1970, c 188, §28; am L
1972, c 88, §5(a); am L 1979, c 105, §60; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c
281, §§6, 11; am L 2004, c 230, §§4, 6; am L 2006, c 21, §1; am L 2011, c 60, §3]

Case Notes

Cited: 31 H. 242, 256 (1930); 35 H. 682, 684 (1940).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next